Illinois, session 104th, HB5208.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Zachary's 5Parent Protection Act. 6    Section 5. The Family Bereavement Leave Act is amended by 7changing Sections 1, 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, 30 and 35 and by adding 8Sections 3, 12, and 14 as follows: 9    (820 ILCS 154/1)10    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 11Bereavement Leave Act.12(Source: P.A. 102-1050, eff. 1-1-23.) 13    (820 ILCS 154/3 new)14    Sec. 3. Findings; legislative intent; construction. The 15General Assembly finds and declares that: 16        (1) the General Assembly first enacted this Act as the 17    Child Bereavement Leave Act through Public Act 99-703, 18    effective July 29, 2016;19        (2) the General Assembly broadened the protections 20    provided in this Act through Public Act 102-1050, 21    effective June 9, 2022, and renamed it the Family   HB5208 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    Bereavement Leave Act;2        (3) the General Assembly subsequently enacted the 3    Child Extended Bereavement Leave Act as a separate Act 4    through Public Act 103-466, effective August 4, 2023;5        (4) these statutory protections for workers grieving 6    the loss of a loved one were made possible by the efforts 7    of parent advocates who championed their passage; and8        (5) this Act, which may be cited as the Bereavement 9    Leave Act, is established to provide for comprehensive and 10    effective administration and enforcement of these 11    statutory protections in a single Act. 12    (820 ILCS 154/5)13    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:14    "Assisted reproduction" means a method of achieving a 15pregnancy through an artificial insemination or an embryo 16transfer and includes gamete and embryo donation. "Assisted 17reproduction" does not include any pregnancy achieved through 18sexual intercourse. 19    "Child" means an employee's child son or daughter who is a 20biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal 21ward, or a child of a person standing in loco parentis.22    "Covered family member" means an employee's child, 23stepchild, spouse, domestic partner, sibling, parent, 24mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandchild, grandparent, or 25stepparent.  HB5208 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    "Department" means the Department of Labor.2    "Domestic partner", used with respect to an unmarried 3employee, includes: 4        (1) the person recognized as the domestic partner of 5    the employee under any domestic partnership or civil union 6    law of a state or political subdivision of a state; or7        (2) an unmarried adult person who is in a committed, 8    personal relationship with the employee, who is not a 9    domestic partner as described in paragraph (1) to or in 10    such a relationship with any other person, and who is 11    designated to the employee's employer by such employee as 12    that employee's domestic partner. 13    "Department" means the Department of Labor.14    "Employee" means any individual permitted to work by an 15employer in an occupation. "Employee" does not include any 16individual:17        (1) who has been and will continue to be free from 18    control and direction over the performance of the 19    employee's work, both under the employee's contract of 20    service with the employer and in fact;21        (2) who performs work which is either outside the 22    usual course of business or is performed outside all of 23    the places of business of the employer unless the employer 24    is in the business of contracting with third parties for 25    the placement of employees; and26        (3) who is in an independently established trade,   HB5208 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    occupation, profession, or business eligible employee, as 2    defined by Section 101(2) of the federal Family and 3    Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).4    "Employer" means any individual, sole proprietor, 5partnership, association, corporation, limited liability 6company, business trust, or employment and labor placement 7agency where wage payments are made directly or indirectly by 8the business or agency for work undertaken by employees under 9hire to a third party who employs at least one employee. 10"Employer" includes the State or a unit of local government, 11any political subdivision of the State or a unit of local 12government, or any State or local government agency. 13"Employer" does not include the federal government or an 14agency of the federal government employer, as defined by 15Section 101(4) of the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 161993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).17    "Pregnancy or adoption related event" means: (i) a 18miscarriage; (ii) an unsuccessful round of intrauterine 19insemination or of an assisted reproductive technology 20procedure; (iii) a failed adoption match or an adoption that 21is not finalized because it is contested by another party; 22(iv) a failed surrogacy agreement; (v) a diagnosis that 23negatively impacts pregnancy or fertility; or (vi) a 24stillbirth. 25(Source: P.A. 102-1050, eff. 1-1-23.)   HB5208 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    (820 ILCS 154/10)2    Sec. 10. Family bereavement Bereavement leave.3    (a) In addition to the bereavement leave afforded in 4Sections 12 and 14, all All employees shall be entitled to use 5an amount a maximum of 2 weeks (10 work days) of unpaid 6bereavement leave to, in accordance with the time limits set 7forth in subsection (a-5):8        (1) attend the funeral or alternative to a funeral of 9    a covered family member;10        (2) make arrangements necessitated by the death of the 11    covered family member;12        (3) grieve the death of the covered family member; or 13        (4) be absent from work due to a pregnancy or adoption 14    related event (i) a miscarriage; (ii) an unsuccessful 15    round of intrauterine insemination or of an assisted 16    reproductive technology procedure; (iii) a failed adoption 17    match or an adoption that is not finalized because it is 18    contested by another party; (iv) a failed surrogacy 19    agreement; (v) a diagnosis that negatively impacts 20    pregnancy or fertility; or (vi) a stillbirth. 21    (a-5) An employee of an employer who employs fewer than 50 22employees is entitled to use a maximum of 5 days of unpaid 23bereavement leave provided for in subsection (a) during any 2412-month period. An employee of an employer who employs 50 or 25more employees is entitled to use a maximum of 10 days of 26unpaid bereavement leave provided for in subsection (a) during   HB5208 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1any 12-month period.2    (b) Bereavement leave under subsection (a) of this Section 3must be taken completed within 60 days after the date on which 4the employee receives notice of the death of the covered 5family member or the date on which an event listed under 6paragraph (4) of subsection (a) occurs. Bereavement leave 7under this Section may be taken in a single continuous period 8or intermittently in increments of no less than 4 hours.9    (c) (Blank). An employee shall provide the employer with 10at least 48 hours' advance notice of the employee's intention 11to take bereavement leave, unless providing such notice is not 12reasonable and practicable.13    (d) (Blank). An employer may, but is not required to, 14require reasonable documentation. Documentation may include a 15death certificate, a published obituary, or written 16verification of death, burial, or memorial services from a 17mortuary, funeral home, burial society, crematorium, religious 18institution, or government agency. For leave resulting from an 19event listed under paragraph (4) of subsection (a), reasonable 20documentation shall include a form, to be provided by the 21Department, to be filled out by a health care practitioner who 22has treated the employee or the employee's spouse or domestic 23partner, or surrogate, for an event listed under paragraph (4) 24of subsection (a), or documentation from the adoption or 25surrogacy organization that the employee worked with related 26to an event listed under paragraph (4) of subsection (a),   HB5208 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1certifying that the employee or his or her spouse or domestic 2partner has experienced an event listed under paragraph (4) of 3subsection (a). The employer may not require that the employee 4identify which category of event the leave pertains to as a 5condition of exercising rights under this Act. 6    (e) In the event of the death of more than one covered 7family member in a 12-month period, an employee is entitled to 8a maximum of up to a total of 6 weeks of bereavement leave 9during the 12-month period. This Act does not create a right 10for an employee to take unpaid leave that exceeds the unpaid 11leave time allowed under, or is in addition to the unpaid leave 12time permitted by, the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 131993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).14(Source: P.A. 102-1050, eff. 1-1-23.) 15    (820 ILCS 154/12 new)16    Sec. 12. Child extended bereavement leave.17    (a) In addition to the bereavement leave afforded under 18Sections 10 and 14:19        (1) An employee of an employer who employs fewer than 20    50 employees is entitled to use a maximum of 3 workweeks of 21    unpaid bereavement leave during any 12-month period if the 22    employee experiences the loss of a child.23        (2) An employee of an employer who employs 50 or more 24    employees but fewer than 250 employees is entitled to use 25    a maximum of 6 workweeks of unpaid bereavement leave   HB5208 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    during any 12-month period if the employee experiences the 2    loss of a child.3        (3) An employee of an employer who employs 250 or more 4    employees is entitled to use a maximum of 12 workweeks of 5    unpaid bereavement leave during any 12-month period if the 6    employee experiences the loss of a child.7    (b) This Section does not apply to employees of the State, 8except for employees who are not otherwise eligible for family 9responsibility leave or a leave of absence without pay.10    (c) Bereavement leave under this Section may be taken in a 11single continuous period or intermittently in increments of no 12less than 4 hours. Bereavement leave under this Section must 13be taken within 12 months after the employee notifies the 14employer of the loss covered under this Section.  15    (820 ILCS 154/14 new)16    Sec. 14. General bereavement leave.17    (a) In addition to the bereavement leave afforded in 18Sections 10 and 12, all employees shall be entitled to use a 19maximum of 3 days of unpaid bereavement leave during any 2012-month period to:21        (1) attend the funeral or alternative to a funeral of 22    any person; or23        (2) make arrangements necessitated by the death of any 24    person.25    (b) Bereavement leave under this Section may be taken in a   HB5208 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1single continuous period or intermittently in increments of no 2less than 4 hours, but leave must be taken within 60 calendar 3days after the employee notifies the employer of the loss 4covered under this Section.5    (c) If more than one death occurs that qualifies a person 6to take leave under this Section during any 12-month period, 7an employee is entitled to a maximum of 3 days of unpaid 8bereavement leave during the 12-month period under this 9Section. 10    (d) This Section does not apply to employees of the State, 11except for employees who are otherwise not eligible for family 12responsibility leave or a leave of absence without pay.  13    (820 ILCS 154/15)14    Sec. 15. Existing leave usable for bereavement and family 15reasons. 16    (a) An employee who is entitled to take paid or unpaid 17leave (including family, medical, sick, annual, personal, or 18similar leave) from employment, pursuant to federal, State, or 19local law, a collective bargaining agreement, or an employment 20benefits program or plan may elect to substitute any period of 21such leave for an equivalent period of leave provided under 22Section 10.23    (b) The bereavement leave provided under this Act is in 24addition to the unpaid leave time allowed under the federal 25Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2601 et seq.).   HB5208 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1(Source: P.A. 99-703, eff. 7-29-16.) 2    (820 ILCS 154/20)3    Sec. 20. Employer Unlawful employer practices.4    (a) It is unlawful for any employer to take any adverse 5action against an employee because the employee (1) exercises 6rights or attempts to exercise rights under this Act, (2) 7opposes practices which such employee believes to be in 8violation of this Act, or (3) supports the exercise of rights 9of another under this Act.10    Exercising rights under this Act includes using or 11requesting to use bereavement leave under this Act, filing an 12action or instituting or causing to be instituted any 13proceeding under or related to this Act; providing or agreeing 14to provide any information in connection with any inquiry or 15proceeding relating to any right provided under this Act; or 16testifying to or agreeing to testify in any inquiry or 17proceeding relating to any right provided under this Act.18    (b) An employer may require that an employee provide the 19employer with at least 48 hours of advance notice of the 20employee's intention to take bereavement leave, unless 21providing the notice is not foreseeable, reasonable, and 22practicable.23    (c) An employer may, but is not required to, require 24reasonable documentation for the use of any form of leave 25afforded under this Act as follows:  HB5208 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        (1) For a leave event related to the death of a covered 2    family member under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of 3    subsection (a) of Section 10, reasonable documentation 4    shall include a death certificate, a published obituary, 5    or written verification of death, burial, or memorial 6    services from a mortuary, funeral home, burial society, 7    crematorium, religious institution, or government agency.8        (2) For a leave event related to a pregnancy or 9    adoption related event under paragraph (4) of subsection 10    (a) of Section 10, reasonable documentation shall include 11    a form, to be provided by the Department, to be filled out 12    by a health care practitioner who has treated the employee 13    or the employee's spouse or domestic partner, or 14    surrogate, for an event listed under paragraph (4) of 15    subsection (a) of Section 10, or documentation from the 16    adoption or surrogacy organization that the employee 17    worked with related to an event listed under paragraph (4) 18    of subsection (a) of Section 10, certifying that the 19    employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner has 20    experienced an event listed under paragraph (4) of 21    subsection (a) of Section 10. The employer may not require 22    that the employee identify which category of pregnancy or 23    adoption related event the leave pertains to as a 24    condition of exercising rights under this Act.25        (3) For a leave event related to the death of a child 26    under Section 12, reasonable documentation shall include a   HB5208 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    death certificate, a published obituary, or written 2    verification of death, burial, or memorial services from a 3    mortuary, funeral home, burial society, crematorium, 4    religious institution, or government agency.5        (4) For a leave event related to the death of any other 6    person under Section 14, reasonable documentation shall 7    include a death certificate, a published obituary, or 8    written verification of death, burial, or memorial 9    services from a mortuary, funeral home, burial society, 10    crematorium, religious institution, or government agency. 11(Source: P.A. 99-703, eff. 7-29-16.) 12    (820 ILCS 154/25)13    Sec. 25. Department responsibilities.14    (a) The Department shall administer and enforce this Act 15and adopt rules under the Illinois Administrative Procedure 16Act for the purpose of this Act. The Department shall review 17complaints to determine whether there is cause for 18investigation. The Department shall have the powers and the 19parties shall have the rights provided in the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act for contested cases. The 21Department shall have the power to conduct investigations in 22connection with the administration and enforcement of this 23Act, including the power to conduct depositions and discovery 24and to issue subpoenas. If the Department finds cause to 25believe that this Act has been violated, the Department shall   HB5208 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1notify the parties in writing and the matter shall be referred 2to an Administrative Law Judge to schedule a formal hearing in 3accordance with hearing procedures established by rule.4    (b) The Department is authorized to impose civil penalties 5prescribed in Section 30 in administrative proceedings that 6comply with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and to 7supervise the payment of the unpaid wages and damages owing to 8the employee or employees under this Act. The Department may 9bring any legal action necessary to recover the amount of 10unpaid wages, damages, and penalties, and the employer shall 11be required to pay the costs. Any sums recovered by the 12Department on behalf of an employee under this Act shall be 13paid to the employee or employees affected. However, 20% of 14any penalty collected from the employer for a violation of 15this Act shall be deposited into the Paid Leave for All Workers 16Child Labor and Day and Temporary Labor Services Enforcement 17Fund.18    (c) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce 19the collection of any civil penalty imposed under this Act.20(Source: P.A. 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 21    (820 ILCS 154/30)22    Sec. 30. Enforcement. 23    (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), an An employee 24who believes his or her rights under this Act or any rule 25adopted under this Act have been violated may, within 60 days   HB5208 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1after the date of the last event constituting the alleged 2violation for which the action is brought, file a complaint 3with the Department or file a civil action.4    (b) An employer that violates any provision of this Act or 5any rule adopted under this Act is subject to a civil penalty 6for each employee affected as follows:7        (1) first offense, a civil penalty not to exceed $500;8        (2) second or subsequent offense, a civil penalty not 9    to exceed $1,000.10    (c) A civil action may be brought in the circuit court by 11an employee against an employer who employs 50 or more 12employees to enforce this Act. The circuit court may enjoin 13any act or practice that violates or may violate this Act and 14may order any other equitable relief that is necessary and 15appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce the Act.16(Source: P.A. 99-703, eff. 7-29-16.) 17    (820 ILCS 154/35)18    Sec. 35. Use of other bereavement leave Other law. An 19employee who uses unpaid bereavement leave under Section 10, 2012, or 14 may not use unpaid bereavement leave under a 21different Section for the death of the same person. A person 22who uses leave under the Child Extended Bereavement Leave Act 23because of the death of a child may not take leave under this 24Act because of the death of the same child.25(Source: P.A. 103-466, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB5208 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    (820 ILCS 156/Act rep.)2    Section 10. The Child Extended Bereavement Leave Act is 3repealed. 4    Section 15. The Victims' Economic Security and Safety Act 5is amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 180/20)7    Sec. 20. Entitlement to leave due to domestic violence, 8sexual violence, gender violence, or any other crime of 9violence. 10    (a) Leave requirement.11        (1) Basis. An employee who is a victim of domestic 12    violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or any other 13    crime of violence or an employee who has a family or 14    household member who is a victim of domestic violence, 15    sexual violence, gender violence, or any other crime of 16    violence whose interests are not adverse to the employee 17    as it relates to the domestic violence, sexual violence, 18    gender violence, or any other crime of violence may take 19    unpaid leave from work if the employee or employee's 20    family or household member is experiencing an incident of 21    domestic violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or 22    any other crime of violence or to address domestic 23    violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or any other   HB5208 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    crime of violence by:2            (A) seeking medical attention for, or recovering 3        from, physical or psychological injuries caused by 4        domestic violence, sexual violence, gender violence, 5        or any other crime of violence to the employee or the 6        employee's family or household member;7            (B) obtaining services from a victim services 8        organization for the employee or the employee's family 9        or household member;10            (C) obtaining psychological or other counseling 11        for the employee or the employee's family or household 12        member;13            (D) participating in safety planning, temporarily 14        or permanently relocating, or taking other actions to 15        increase the safety of the employee or the employee's 16        family or household member from future domestic 17        violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or any 18        other crime of violence or ensure economic security;19            (E) seeking legal assistance or remedies to ensure 20        the health and safety of the employee or the 21        employee's family or household member, including 22        preparing for or participating in any civil, criminal, 23        or military legal proceeding related to or derived 24        from domestic violence, sexual violence, gender 25        violence, or any other crime of violence;26            (F) attending the funeral or alternative to a   HB5208 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        funeral or wake of a family or household member who is 2        killed in a crime of violence;3            (G) making arrangements necessitated by the death 4        of a family or household member who is killed in a 5        crime of violence; or6            (H) grieving the death of a family or household 7        member who is killed in a crime of violence.8        (2) Period. Subject to subsection (c) and except as 9    provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, an employee 10    working for an employer that employs at least 50 employees 11    shall be entitled to a total of 12 workweeks of leave 12    during any 12-month period. Subject to subsection (c) and 13    except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, an 14    employee working for an employer that employs at least 15 15    but not more than 49 employees shall be entitled to a total 16    of 8 workweeks of leave during any 12-month period. 17    Subject to subsection (c) and except as provided in 18    paragraph (4) of this subsection, an employee working for 19    an employer that employs at least one but not more than 14 20    employees shall be entitled to a total of 4 workweeks of 21    leave during any 12-month period. The total number of 22    workweeks to which an employee is entitled shall not 23    decrease during the relevant 12-month period. This Act 24    does not create a right for an employee to take unpaid 25    leave that exceeds the unpaid leave time allowed under, or 26    is in addition to the unpaid leave time permitted by, the   HB5208 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. 2    2601 et seq.).3        (3) Schedule. Leave described in paragraph (1) may be 4    taken consecutively, intermittently, or on a reduced work 5    schedule.6        (4) Exceptions. An employee shall be entitled to use a 7    cumulative total of not more than 2 workweeks (10 work 8    days) of unpaid leave for the purposes described in 9    subparagraph subparagraphs (F), (G), or (H) of paragraph 10    (1), which must be completed within 60 days after the date 11    on which the employee receives notice of the death of the 12    victim, and is subject to the following:13            (A) Except as provided in paragraph subparagraph 14        (2), if an employee is also entitled to take taken 15        unpaid bereavement leave under the Family Bereavement 16        Leave Act as a result of the death of the victim, this 17        Act does not create a right for the employee to take 18        unpaid bereavement leave that exceeds, or is in 19        addition to, the unpaid bereavement leave the employee 20        is entitled to take under the Family Bereavement Leave 21        Act.22            (B) If an employee is also entitled to take unpaid 23        bereavement leave under the Family Bereavement Leave 24        Act as a result of the death of the victim, leave taken 25        under this Act for the purposes described in 26        subparagraph subparagraphs (F), (G), or (H) of   HB5208 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        paragraph (1) or leave taken under the Family 2        Bereavement Leave Act shall be in addition to, and 3        shall not diminish, the total amount of leave time an 4        employee is entitled to under paragraph (2). 5            (C) If an employee is not entitled to unpaid 6        bereavement leave under the Family Bereavement Leave 7        Act as a result of the death of the victim, leave taken 8        for the purposes described in subparagraph 9        subparagraphs (F), (G), or (H) of paragraph (1) shall 10        be deducted from, and is not in addition to, the total 11        amount of leave time an employee is entitled to under 12        paragraph (2).13            (D) Leave taken for the purposes described in 14        subparagraph subparagraphs (F), (G), or (H) of 15        paragraph (1) shall not otherwise limit or diminish 16        the total amount of leave time an employee is entitled 17        to take under paragraph (2). 18    (b) Notice. The employee shall provide the employer with 19at least 48 hours' advance notice of the employee's intention 20to take the leave, unless providing such notice is not 21practicable. When an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer 22may not take any action against the employee if the employee, 23upon request of the employer and within a reasonable period 24after the absence, provides certification under subsection 25(c).26    (c) Certification.  HB5208 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        (1) In general. The employer may require the employee 2    to provide certification to the employer that:3            (A) the employee or the employee's family or 4        household member is a victim of domestic violence, 5        sexual violence, gender violence, or any other crime 6        of violence; and7            (B) the leave is for one of the purposes 8        enumerated in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) (a)(1).9        The employee shall provide such certification to the 10    employer within a reasonable period after the employer 11    requests certification.12        (2) Contents. An employee may satisfy the 13    certification requirement of paragraph (1) by providing to 14    the employer a sworn statement of the employee, and if the 15    employee has possession of such document, the employee 16    shall provide one of the following documents:17            (A) documentation from an employee, agent, or 18        volunteer of a victim services organization, an 19        attorney, a member of the clergy, or a medical or other 20        professional from whom the employee or the employee's 21        family or household member has sought assistance in 22        addressing domestic violence, sexual violence, gender 23        violence, or any other crime of violence and the 24        effects of the violence;25            (B) a police, court, or military record;26            (B-5) a death certificate, published obituary, or   HB5208 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        written verification of death, burial, or memorial 2        services from a mortuary, funeral home, burial 3        society, crematorium, religious institution, or 4        government agency, documenting that a victim was 5        killed in a crime of violence; or 6            (C) other corroborating evidence.7        The employee shall choose which document to submit, 8    and the employer shall not request or require more than 9    one document to be submitted during the same 12-month 10    period leave is requested or taken if the reason for leave 11    is related to the same incident or incidents of violence 12    or the same perpetrator or perpetrators of the violence. 13    (d) Confidentiality. All information provided to the 14employer pursuant to subsection (b) or (c), including a 15statement of the employee or any other documentation, record, 16or corroborating evidence, and the fact that the employee has 17requested or obtained leave pursuant to this Section, shall be 18retained in the strictest confidence by the employer, except 19to the extent that disclosure is:20        (1) requested or consented to in writing by the 21    employee; or22        (2) otherwise required by applicable federal or State 23    law.24    (e) Employment and benefits.25        (1) Restoration to position.26            (A) In general. Any employee who takes leave under   HB5208 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        this Section for the intended purpose of the leave 2        shall be entitled, on return from such leave:3                (i) to be restored by the employer to the 4            position of employment held by the employee when 5            the leave commenced; or6                (ii) to be restored to an equivalent position 7            with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and 8            other terms and conditions of employment.9            (B) Loss of benefits. The taking of leave under 10        this Section shall not result in the loss of any 11        employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which 12        the leave commenced.13            (C) Limitations. Nothing in this subsection shall 14        be construed to entitle any restored employee to:15                (i) the accrual of any seniority or employment 16            benefits during any period of leave; or17                (ii) any right, benefit, or position of 18            employment other than any right, benefit, or 19            position to which the employee would have been 20            entitled had the employee not taken the leave.21            (D) Construction. Nothing in this paragraph shall 22        be construed to prohibit an employer from requiring an 23        employee on leave under this Section to report 24        periodically to the employer on the status and 25        intention of the employee to return to work.26        (2) Maintenance of health benefits.  HB5208 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1            (A) Coverage. Except as provided in subparagraph 2        (B), during any period that an employee takes leave 3        under this Section, the employer shall maintain 4        coverage for the employee and any family or household 5        member under any group health plan for the duration of 6        such leave at the level and under the conditions 7        coverage would have been provided if the employee had 8        continued in employment continuously for the duration 9        of such leave.10            (B) Failure to return from leave. The employer may 11        recover the premium that the employer paid for 12        maintaining coverage for the employee and the 13        employee's family or household member under such group 14        health plan during any period of leave under this 15        Section if:16                (i) the employee fails to return from leave 17            under this Section after the period of leave to 18            which the employee is entitled has expired; and19                (ii) the employee fails to return to work for 20            a reason other than:21                    (I) the continuation, recurrence, or onset 22                of domestic violence, sexual violence, gender 23                violence, or any other crime of violence that 24                entitles the employee to leave pursuant to 25                this Section; or26                    (II) other circumstances beyond the   HB5208 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1                control of the employee.2            (C) Certification.3                (i) Issuance. An employer may require an 4            employee who claims that the employee is unable to 5            return to work because of a reason described in 6            subclause (I) or (II) of clause (ii) of 7            subparagraph (B) (B)(ii) to provide, within a 8            reasonable period after making the claim, 9            certification to the employer that the employee is 10            unable to return to work because of that reason.11                (ii) Contents. An employee may satisfy the 12            certification requirement of clause (i) by 13            providing to the employer:14                    (I) a sworn statement of the employee;15                    (II) documentation from an employee, 16                agent, or volunteer of a victim services 17                organization, an attorney, a member of the 18                clergy, or a medical or other professional 19                from whom the employee has sought assistance 20                in addressing domestic violence, sexual 21                violence, gender violence, or any other crime 22                of violence and the effects of that violence;23                    (III) a police, court, or military record; 24                or25                    (IV) other corroborating evidence.26            The employee shall choose which document to   HB5208 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        submit, and the employer shall not request or require 2        more than one document to be submitted. 3            (D) Confidentiality. All information provided to 4        the employer pursuant to subparagraph (C), including a 5        statement of the employee or any other documentation, 6        record, or corroborating evidence, and the fact that 7        the employee is not returning to work because of a 8        reason described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause 9        (ii) of subparagraph (B) (B)(ii) shall be retained in 10        the strictest confidence by the employer, except to 11        the extent that disclosure is:12                (i) requested or consented to in writing by 13            the employee; or14                (ii) otherwise required by applicable federal 15            or State law.16    (f) Prohibited acts.17        (1) Interference with rights.18            (A) Exercise of rights. It shall be unlawful for 19        any employer to interfere with, restrain, or deny the 20        exercise of or the attempt to exercise any right 21        provided under this Section.22            (B) Employer discrimination. It shall be unlawful 23        for any employer to discharge or harass any 24        individual, or otherwise discriminate against any 25        individual with respect to compensation, terms, 26        conditions, or privileges of employment of the   HB5208 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1        individual (including retaliation in any form or 2        manner) because the individual:3                (i) exercised any right provided under this 4            Section; or5                (ii) opposed any practice made unlawful by 6            this Section.7            (C) Public agency sanctions. It shall be unlawful 8        for any public agency to deny, reduce, or terminate 9        the benefits of, otherwise sanction, or harass any 10        individual, or otherwise discriminate against any 11        individual with respect to the amount, terms, or 12        conditions of public assistance of the individual 13        (including retaliation in any form or manner) because 14        the individual:15                (i) exercised any right provided under this 16            Section; or17                (ii) opposed any practice made unlawful by 18            this Section.19        (2) Interference with proceedings or inquiries. It 20    shall be unlawful for any person to discharge or in any 21    other manner discriminate (as described in subparagraph 22    (B) or (C) of paragraph (1)) against any individual 23    because such individual:24            (A) has filed any charge, or has instituted or 25        caused to be instituted any proceeding, under or 26        related to this Section;  HB5208 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1            (B) has given, or is about to give, any 2        information in connection with any inquiry or 3        proceeding relating to any right provided under this 4        Section; or5            (C) has testified, or is about to testify, in any 6        inquiry or proceeding relating to any right provided 7        under this Section.8(Source: P.A. 102-487, eff. 1-1-22; 102-890, eff. 5-19-22; 9103-314, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-10-25.) 10    Section 20. The Child Labor Law of 2024 is amended by 11changing Section 75 as follows: 12    (820 ILCS 206/75)13    Sec. 75. Civil penalties. 14    (a) Any person employing, allowing, or permitting a minor 15to work who violates any of the provisions of this Act or any 16rule adopted under the Act shall be subject to civil penalties 17as follows: 18        (1) if a minor dies while working for an employer who 19    is found by the Department to have been employing, 20    allowing, or permitting the minor to work in violation of 21    this Act, the employer is subject to a penalty not to 22    exceed $60,000, payable to the Department;23        (2) if a minor receives an illness or an injury that is 24    required to be reported to the Department under Section 35   HB5208 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1    while working for an employer who is found by the 2    Department to have been employing, allowing, or permitting 3    the minor to work in violation of this Act, the employer is 4    subject to a penalty not to exceed $30,000, payable to the 5    Department;6        (3) an employer who employs, allows, or permits a 7    minor to work in violation of Section 40 shall be subject 8    to a penalty not to exceed $15,000, payable to the 9    Department; 10        (4) an employer who fails to post or provide the 11    required notice under subsection (g) of Section 35 shall 12    be subject to a penalty not to exceed $500, payable to the 13    Department; and14        (5) an employer who commits any other violation of 15    this Act shall be subject to a penalty not to exceed 16    $10,000, payable to the Department.17    In determining the amount of the penalty, the 18appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of 19the employer charged and the gravity of the violation shall be 20considered. 21    Each day during which any violation of this Act continues 22shall constitute a separate and distinct offense, and the 23employment of any minor in violation of the Act shall, with 24respect to each minor so employed, constitute a separate and 25distinct offense.26    (b) Any administrative determination by the Department of   HB5208 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1the amount of each penalty shall be final unless reviewed as 2provided in Section 70. 3    (c) The amount of the penalty, when finally determined, 4may be recovered in a civil action brought by the Director in 5any circuit court, in which litigation the Director shall be 6represented by the Attorney General. In an action brought by 7the Department, the Department may request, and the Court may 8impose on a defendant employer, an additional civil penalty of 9up to an amount equal to the penalties assessed by the 10Department to be distributed to an impacted minor. In an 11action concerning multiple minors, any such penalty imposed by 12the Court shall be distributed equally among the minors 13employed in violation of this Act by the defendant employer.14    (d) Penalties recovered under this Section shall be paid 15by certified check, money order, or by an electronic payment 16system designated by the Department, and deposited into the 17Child Labor and Day and Temporary Labor Services Enforcement 18Fund, a special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund 19shall be used, subject to appropriation, for exemplary 20programs, demonstration projects, and other activities or 21purposes related to the enforcement of this Act, and for the 22activities or purposes related to the enforcement of the Day 23and Temporary Labor Services Act, the Private Employment 24Agency Act, or the Right to Privacy in the Workplace Act, for 25the activities or purposes related to the enforcement of the 26Job Opportunities for Qualified Applicants Act, and for the   HB5208 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 19697 SPS 33146 b1activities or purposes related to the enforcement of the 2Family Bereavement Leave Act.3(Source: P.A. 103-721, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 4104-455, eff. 12-12-25; revised 1-8-26.)